New York, session 2025-2026, S1761.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The office of children and family services, in conjunction 2 with the inspector general, is authorized and directed to conduct a 3 study on the family assessment response program. Such study shall: 4 (a) determine if the program is accomplishing the program's intended 5 goals; 6 (b) determine if the program is being operated as designed; 7 (c) identify areas where the program can be improved; 8 (d) suggest changes to the program to improve areas where the program 9 needs improvement; 10 (e) specify why certain areas of the program require changes; 11 (f) identify if the application and/or approval process localities 12 utilize for approval of family assessment response program plans require 13 updates or modifications; 14 (g) determine if the program is worth expanding across the state, 15 making the program either an opt-out or mandatory program; 16 (h) examine the potential mandated expansion of the family assessment 17 response program in the state of New York, including, but not limited 18 to: 19 (i) how has the program worked in localities which have adopted such 20 family assessment response program via application approved by the 21 office of children and family services; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05064-01-5 S. 1761 2 1 (ii) the frequency with which child protective services' investi- 2 gations are initiated into a familial unit within six months of such 3 familial unit completing a family assessment response case; and 4 (iii) the percentage of children alleged to be maltreated in a family 5 assessment response case who are later determined to be maltreated in a 6 subsequent child protective services' investigation within six months of 7 the closure of such family assessment response case; and 8 (i) study anything else the office of children and family services or 9 the inspector general determines necessary to determine if the family 10 assessment response program is working as designed, if it can be 11 improved, and if it is worth expanding and/or mandating state-wide. 12 § 2. The office of children and family services, in conjunction with 13 the inspector general, shall publish a report containing the findings of 14 the study. Such report shall be delivered to the governor, the temporary 15 president of the senate, and the speaker of the assembly no later than 16 one year after the effective date of this act. 17 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 18 deemed repealed two years after such effective date.